Idaho, session 2025, H0371.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Endowment Fund Investment Board the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the Endowment Earnings Administrative Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $80,000
Operating Expenditures 1,200
Capital Outlay 4,900
TOTAL $86,100
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.